testdata/short-invalid.dix
 <pardef n="separa">

                                    <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>

                                    <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l><r/></p><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

 <pardef n="emails">

                            <e>
      <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

</pardefs>

                        <e><par n="separa"/></e>
                        <e><par n="emails"/></e>
